test/src/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.ana.yaml
  Noun - čáhppesoasus: # VIELG Attr + MALISLONG
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppesoasus
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Gen: čáhppesossosa
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Acc: čáhppesossosa
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Loc: čáhppesossosis
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Ill: čáhppesossosii
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Com: čáhppesossosiin
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Nom: čáhppesossosat
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Gen: čáhppesossosiid
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Acc: čáhppesossosiid 
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Loc: čáhppesossosiin 
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Ill: čáhppesossosiidda
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Com: čáhppesossosiiguin
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Ess: čáhppesoasusin
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppesossosaš
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppesossosaččaš
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: čáhppesoasusheapme
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: čáhppesoasuslaš
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppes-oasus
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Gen: čáhppes-ossosa
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Acc: čáhppes-ossosa
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Loc: čáhppes-ossosis
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Ill: čáhppes-ossosii
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Com: čáhppes-ossosiin
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Nom: čáhppes-ossosat
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Gen: čáhppes-ossosiid
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Acc: čáhppes-ossosiid 
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Loc: čáhppes-ossosiin 
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Ill: čáhppes-ossosiidda
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Com: čáhppes-ossosiiguin
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Ess: čáhppes-oasusin
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppes-ossosaš
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppes-ossosaččaš
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: čáhppes-oasusheapme
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: čáhppes-oasuslaš


  Noun - viežžanolmmoš : # BOAHTINTV SgCmp + FALIS
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Nom: viežžanolmmoš 
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Loc: viežžanolbmos
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Ill: viežžanolbmui
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Nom: viežžan-olmmoš 
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Loc: viežžan-olbmos
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Ill: viežžan-olbmui

  Noun - uksageahči : # GOAHTI-A SgNomCmp + AIGI
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uksageahči
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uksageažis
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uksageahčái
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uksa-geahči
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uksa-geažis
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uksa-geahčái

  Noun - uvssageahči : # GOAHTI-A SgGenCmp + AIGI
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uvssageahči
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uvssageažis
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uvssageahčái
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uvssa-geahči
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uvssa-geažis
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uvssa-geahčái

  Noun - uvssaidgeahči : # GOAHTI-A PlGenCmp + AIGI
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uvssaidgeahči
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uvssaidgeažis
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uvssaidgeahčái
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uvssaid-geahči
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uvssaid-geažis
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uvssaid-geahčái

  Noun - niibedilli : # GOAHTI-I SgNomCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niibedilli
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niibedilis
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niibedillái
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niibe-dilli
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niibe-dilis
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niibe-dillái


  Noun - niibbidilli : # GOAHTI-I SgGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibbidilli, niibbedilli]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibbidilis, niibbedilis]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibbidillái, niibbedillái]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibbi-dilli, niibbe-dilli]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibbi-dilis, niibbe-dilis]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibbi-dillái, niibbe-dillái]

  Noun - niibbiiddilli : # GOAHTI-I PlGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niibbiiddilli
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niibbiiddilis
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niibbiiddillái
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niibbiid-dilli
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niibbiid-dilis
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niibbiid-dillái
